Washington statutes.
RCW 35.56.260

Waterways—Abutting lands—Lessee must lease shoreline property.

At the time that the city leases to any individual or concern any of the land abutting on the area between the shore lines and the dock lines the same individual or concern must likewise for the same period of time lease all of the area between the shore line and dock line of such canal or waterway lying contiguous to and immediately in front of the abutting land so leased.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.56.260. Prior: 1913 c 16 s 18, part; RRS s 9466, part.]